Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 1
BONDS - FUNDING - FLOATING INDEBTEDNESS

30-26-101. Exchange of warrants for bonds - notice.

It is the duty of the board of county commissioners of any county having a floating indebtedness exceeding five thousand dollars, upon the petition of fifty registered qualified electors of said county, to publish for the period of thirty days, in a newspaper published within said county, a notice requesting the holders of the warrants of such county to submit, in writing, to the board of county commissioners of said county, within sixty days from the date of the first publication of such notice, a statement of the amount of warrants of such county which they will exchange for the bonds of such county, to be issued under the provisions of this part 1, and the rate at which they will exchange such warrants for such bonds, taking such bonds at par. In case no newspaper is published within such county, such notice may be published in such newspaper published in the city of Denver as the board of county commissioners may select.

It is the duty of such board of county commissioners, upon the petition of fifty of the registered qualified electors of such county, to publish, for the period of at least thirty days immediately preceding a general election, in some newspaper published within such county a notice that at said general election there will be submitted the question whether the board of county commissioners shall issue bonds of such county under the provisions of this part 1 in exchange, at a certain rate, for the warrants of such county issued prior to the date of the first publication of the notice, which rate shall be determined by the board of county commissioners, and it shall be stated in said notice. The question of whether such county indebtedness shall be funded under the provisions of this part 1 and the maximum net effective interest rate such funding bonds shall bear shall be submitted at the next ensuing general election or may be submitted at a special election which said board is empowered to call for that purpose, at any time after the expiration of sixty days from the date of the first publication of the notice, on the petition of fifty registered qualified electors. Said board shall publish, for the period of at least thirty days immediately preceding such special election, in some newspaper published within such county a notice that such question will be submitted at such election. In case no newspaper is published within such county, the board of county commissioners shall cause such notice to be posted in at least two conspicuous places in each of the election precincts of such county, at least thirty days prior to the said election, general or special. Such election shall be held and the results thereof determined in the same manner as provided for authorization of other bonded indebtedness in accordance with part 3 of this article.

The county clerk and recorder of such county shall make out and cause to be delivered to the judges of election in each election precinct in the county, prior to the election, a certified list of the registered qualified electors in such county; and no person shall vote upon the question of the funding of the county indebtedness unless he has the necessary qualifications as provided by law.

If the issuance of said bonds is approved at such election, the board of county commissioners may issue to any person or corporation holding any county warrant issued prior to the date of the first publication of the notice coupon bonds of such county in exchange therefor at a rate not exceeding that named in the notice published by the board of county commissioners. Should any of the bonds so voted be not exchanged for county warrants, as provided in this part 1, the board of county commissioners may sell the bonds so voted at, above, or below their par values and with the proceeds of such sale redeem or buy the warrants not so exchanged, subject to the provisions of this part 1, but the proceeds of such sale of bonds shall be applied to the purchase or redemption of such warrants and for no other purpose whatever.

No bond shall be issued of less denomination than fifty dollars and, if issued for a greater amount, for some multiple of that sum. The bonds shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, the interest to be paid semiannually at the office of the county treasurer or at the city of New York, at the option of the holders thereof, upon the production of the proper coupons for the same, the bonds to be payable at the pleasure of the county after ten years from the date of their issuance, but absolutely due and payable twenty years after the date of issue. The whole amount of bonds issued under this part 1 shall not exceed the sum of the county indebtedness at the date of the first publication of the notice submitting the question of funding the county indebtedness; and the amount shall be determined by the board of county commissioners, and a certificate made of the same, and made a part of the records of the county; and any bond issued in excess of that sum shall be void.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 85, § 1.

G.S.

§ 676.

L. 1885:

p. 232, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1369.

C.L.

§ 8847.

CSA:

C. 45, § 199.

CRS 53:

§ 36-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-4-1.

L. 70:

p. 136, § 2.

L. 98:

(5) amended, p. 1338, § 56, effective June 1.

L. 2017:

(5) amended, (HB 17-1005), ch. 8, p. 24, § 3, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For clarification of terms and requirements for notice by publication, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24; for how county indebtedness is created, the limits on such indebtedness and refunding, see § 6 of art. XI, Colo. Const.

30-26-102. Election on bond issue - duties of judges.

All persons voting on the question of funding indebtedness shall vote by separate ballot, which shall be deposited in a box to be used for that purpose only and on which ballot shall be printed the words "for funding county debt" or "against funding county debt"; and if, upon canvassing the vote, which shall be canvassed in the same manner as the vote for county officers, it appears that a majority of all the votes cast upon the question so submitted is for funding the county debt, the board of county commissioners shall be authorized to carry out the provisions of this part 1, and the canvassing board shall certify the vote, and it shall be made a part of the county records.

The judges of election shall make and certify to the county clerk and recorder a separate list of the names of the electors voting upon the question of the funding of the county indebtedness in the order in which the ballot of the elector so voting is received, and each ballot shall be numbered in the order in which it is received and the number recorded on the said list of voters opposite the name of the voter who presents the ballot.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 88, § 5.

G.S.

§ 680.

R.S. 08:

§ 1390.

C.L.

§ 8851.

CSA:

C. 45, § 203.

CRS 53:

§ 36-4-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-4-5.

Cross references:

For manner of canvassing votes for county officers, see part 1 of article 10 of title 1.

30-26-103. Officers to proceed as authorized after election.

As soon as possible after such election if the bonds shall be voted, the officers mentioned and authorized shall proceed to execute the provisions of this part 1.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 89, § 6.

G.S.

§ 681.

R.S. 08:

§ 1391.

C.L.

§ 8852.

CSA:

C. 45, § 204.

CRS 53:

§ 36-4-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-4-6.

30-26-104. Bonds - how executed.

All bonds which may be issued under the provisions of this part 1 shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners, countersigned by the county treasurer of the county, and attested by the clerk and recorder of said county, and shall bear the seal of the county upon each bond, and shall be numbered and registered in a book kept for that purpose by the county treasurer in the order in which they are issued; each bond shall state upon its face the amount for which the same is issued, to whom issued, and the date of its issuance.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 87, § 2.

G.S.

§ 677.

R.S. 08:

§ 1387.

C.L.

§ 8848.

CSA:

C. 45, § 200.

CRS 53:

§ 36-4-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-4-2.

30-26-105. Form of bonds - redemption fund.

The board of county commissioners is authorized to prescribe the form of such bonds, and the coupons thereto, and to provide for the half-yearly interest accruing on such bonds actually issued and delivered; they shall levy annually a sufficient tax to fully discharge such interest; and, for the ultimate redemption of such bonds, they shall levy annually, after nine years from the date of such issuance, such tax upon all the taxable property in their county as shall create a yearly fund equal to ten percent of the whole amount of such bonds issued, which fund shall be called the redemption fund. All taxes for interest on and for the redemption of such bonds shall be paid in cash only and shall be kept by the county treasurer as a special fund to be used in payment of interest on and for the redemption of such bonds only; and such taxes shall be levied and collected as other taxes.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 87, § 3.

G.S.

§ 678.

R.S. 08:

§ 1388.

C.L.

§ 8849.

CSA:

C. 45, § 201.

CRS 53:

§ 36-4-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-4-3.

30-26-106. Redemption - order of payment - notice.

It is the duty of the county treasurer, when there are sufficient funds in his hands to the credit of the redemption fund to pay in full the principal and interest of any such bonds, immediately to call in and pay as many of such bonds and accrued interest thereon as the funds on hand will liquidate. Such bonds shall be paid in the order of their number; and, when any bonds or coupons issued under this part 1 are taken up, it is the duty of such treasurer to certify his action to the board of county commissioners, who shall cancel the same, so that they can be plainly identified, and cause a record to be made of the same. When it is desired to redeem any of such bonds, the county treasurer shall cause to be published for thirty days, in some newspaper at or nearest the county seat of the county and in a newspaper published in the city of Denver, a notice that certain county bonds, by numbers and amounts, will be paid upon presentation, and at the expiration of thirty days such bonds shall cease to bear interest.

Source:

L. 1881:

p. 88, § 4.

G.S.

§ 679.

R.S. 08:

§ 1389.

C.L.

§ 8850.

CSA:

C. 45, § 202.

CRS 53:

§ 36-4-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-4-4.

Cross references:

For clarification of terms and requirements for notice by publication, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24.